Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-804
Compact administrator; arrange for payments to discharge financial obligations.

The compact administrator, with the approval of the state budget officer and the Governor, may make or arrange for any payments necessary to discharge any financial obligations imposed upon this state by the compact or by any supplementary agreement entered into thereunder.

Laws 1969, c. 556, § 4, p. 2271.